src/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
LEXICON ROMAN   !!≈ * __@CODE@__  roman numerals
 +Use/Circ: ROM-THOUSAND ; !
 +Use/Circ: ROM-HUNDRED ; !
 +Use/Circ: ROM-TEN ; !
 +Use/Circ: ROM-ONE ; !

LEXICON ROM-THOUSAND   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
     M+Use/Circ:M     ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;
    MM+Use/Circ:MM    ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;
   MMM+Use/Circ:MMM   ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;
  MMMM+Use/Circ:MMMM  ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;
 MMMMM+Use/Circ:MMMMM ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;

LEXICON ROM-THOUSAND-TAG   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 +Use/Circ: ROMNUMTAG   ; !
 +Use/Circ: ROM-HUNDRED ; !
 +Use/Circ: ROM-TEN     ; !
 +Use/Circ: ROM-ONE     ; !
 +Use/Circ: ROM-SPLIT   ; !

LEXICON ROM-HUNDRED   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
    C+Use/Circ:C    ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
   CC+Use/Circ:CC   ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
  CCC+Use/Circ:CCC  ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
   CD+Use/Circ:CD   ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
    D+Use/Circ:D    ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
   DC+Use/Circ:DC   ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
  DCC+Use/Circ:DCC  ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
 DCCC+Use/Circ:DCCC ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
   CM+Use/Circ:CM   ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;

LEXICON ROM-HUNDRED-TAG   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 +Use/Circ: ROMNUMTAG ;
 +Use/Circ: ROM-TEN   ;
 +Use/Circ: ROM-ONE   ;
 +Use/Circ: ROM-SPLIT ;

LEXICON ROM-TEN   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
    X+Use/Circ:X    ROM-TEN-TAG ;
   XX+Use/Circ:XX   ROM-TEN-TAG ;
  XXX+Use/Circ:XXX  ROM-TEN-TAG ;
   XL+Use/Circ:XL   ROM-TEN-TAG ;
    L+Use/Circ:L    ROM-TEN-TAG ;
   LX+Use/Circ:LX   ROM-TEN-TAG ;
  LXX+Use/Circ:LXX  ROM-TEN-TAG ;
 LXXX+Use/Circ:LXXX ROM-TEN-TAG ;
   XC+Use/Circ:XC   ROM-TEN-TAG ;

LEXICON ROM-TEN-TAG   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 +Use/Circ: ROMNUMTAG ;
 +Use/Circ: ROM-ONE   ;
 +Use/Circ: ROM-SPLIT ;

LEXICON ROM-ONE   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
    I+Use/Circ:I    ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   II+Use/Circ:II   ROM-ONE-TAG ;
  III+Use/Circ:III  ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   IV+Use/Circ:IV   ROM-ONE-TAG ;
    V+Use/Circ:V    ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   VI+Use/Circ:VI   ROM-ONE-TAG ;
  VII+Use/Circ:VII  ROM-ONE-TAG ;
 VIII+Use/Circ:VIII ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   IX+Use/Circ:IX   ROM-ONE-TAG ;

LEXICON ROM-ONE-TAG   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
  +Use/Circ: ROMNUMTAG ;
!        +N: ROMNUMTAG ; ! !The Olav viđeš fix (Roman V now gets A)
  +Use/Circ: ROM-SPLIT ;

! Here, we split the Roman numerals, in order to account for cases like
! "Kapihtal II-IV". We may send this first part directly to ROM-TAG below (and
! get the +Num tag), or we may send them through a second loop, identical to
! the first one, but marked wit "2" (the lexica are called 2ROMAN, etc. We do
! this instead of making a loop, since we do not want cases like
! "II-IV-VI-VII-IX". If that should turn out to be a good idea, a loop would
! do the trick.

LEXICON ROM-SPLIT   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 +Use/Circ:%- 2ROMAN ; ! II-VI, etc. !


! Here goes loop 2.

LEXICON 2ROMAN   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-THOUSAND ;
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-HUNDRED  ;
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-TEN      ;
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-ONE      ;

LEXICON 2ROM-THOUSAND   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
     M+Use/Circ:M     2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;
    MM+Use/Circ:MM    2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;
   MMM+Use/Circ:MMM   2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;
  MMMM+Use/Circ:MMMM  2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;
 MMMMM+Use/Circ:MMMMM 2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;

LEXICON 2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 +Use/Circ: ROMNUMTAG    ;
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-HUNDRED ;
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-TEN     ;
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-ONE     ;

LEXICON 2ROM-HUNDRED   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
    C+Use/Circ:C    2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
   CC+Use/Circ:CC   2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
  CCC+Use/Circ:CCC  2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
   CD+Use/Circ:CD   2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
    D+Use/Circ:D    2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
   DC+Use/Circ:DC   2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
  DCC+Use/Circ:DCC  2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
 DCCC+Use/Circ:DCCC 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
   CM+Use/Circ:CM   2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;

LEXICON 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 +Use/Circ: ROMNUMTAG ;
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-TEN  ;
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-ONE  ;

LEXICON 2ROM-TEN   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
    X+Use/Circ:X    2ROM-TEN-TAG ;
   XX+Use/Circ:XX   2ROM-TEN-TAG ;
  XXX+Use/Circ:XXX  2ROM-TEN-TAG ;
   XL+Use/Circ:XL   2ROM-TEN-TAG ;
    L+Use/Circ:L    2ROM-TEN-TAG ;
   LX+Use/Circ:LX   2ROM-TEN-TAG ;
  LXX+Use/Circ:LXX  2ROM-TEN-TAG ;
 LXXX+Use/Circ:LXXX 2ROM-TEN-TAG ;
   XC+Use/Circ:XC   2ROM-TEN-TAG ;

LEXICON 2ROM-TEN-TAG   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 +Use/Circ: ROMNUMTAG ;
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-ONE  ;

LEXICON 2ROM-ONE   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
    I+Use/Circ:I    2ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   II+Use/Circ:II   2ROM-ONE-TAG ;
  III+Use/Circ:III  2ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   IV+Use/Circ:IV   2ROM-ONE-TAG ;
    V+Use/Circ:V    2ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   VI+Use/Circ:VI   2ROM-ONE-TAG ;
  VII+Use/Circ:VII  2ROM-ONE-TAG ;
 VIII+Use/Circ:VIII 2ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   IX+Use/Circ:IX   2ROM-ONE-TAG ;

LEXICON 2ROM-ONE-TAG   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 +Use/Circ: ROMNUMTAG ;

LEXICON ROMNUMTAG   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
  +Num+Rom+Sg+Nom+Use/Circ:   #            ;
!     +Num+Sg+Gen+Use/Circ:   #            ;
!     +Num+Sg+Acc+Use/Circ:   #            ;
!    +A+Rom+Ord+Sg+Use/Circ:%. #            ; ! !III. as ordinal.
!    +A+Rom+Ord+Sg+Use/Circ:   #            ; ! !Looking for trouble...
